Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2689.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1718-E(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1718-E. Department of Agriculture.(a) Appropriations.--The following shall apply to appropriations for the Department of Agriculture:* * *(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from remaining money allocated for highly pathogenic avian influenza prior to fiscal year 2024-2025, the following shall apply:(i) No more than $20,000,000 shall be used for a disaster recovery grant program to assist fruit and vegetable growers who experienced losses exceeding 30% of expected 2026 production of eligible Pennsylvania-grown specialty crops due to freeze events that occurred between April 1 and April 21, 2026.(ii) Pennsylvania-grown specialty crops include all pome and stone fruits, grapes, berries and vegetables.(iii) Losses or costs that are eligible for or covered by Federal funding, insurance, contracts or other funding sources are not eligible for recovery grant funding under this paragraph.(iv) Within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Agriculture shall submit 20260HB2689PN3754 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 guidelines to implement this paragraph to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2689PN3754 - 3 - 123456